04_Morphology/morph/grn.twol
Alphabet

A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Ä Ë Ö Ü ß

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ä ë ö ü

%{m%}:e
%{m%}:0
;

Sets

vs = a e i o u 
	 A E I U O
	 Ä Ë Ö Ü
    	 ä ë ö ü ;

cns = b c d f g h j k l m p q r s t v w x z
	     B C D F G H J K L M P Q R S T V W X Z ;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Remove [e] in suffixes if following a vowel"
%{m%}:0 <=> l %> _ ;
	   
